Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201277-5001
Act, how cited.

Sections 77-5001 to 77-5031 shall be known and may be cited
as the Tax Equalization and Review Commission Act.

Laws 1995, LB 490, § 1;

Laws 1997, LB 270, § 100;

Laws 1997, LB 397, § 34;

Laws 1998, LB 1104, § 23;

Laws 2003, LB 291, § 4;

Laws 2004, LB 973, § 46;

Laws 2011, LB384, § 20.